Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2614
Sales of swine; reports available to public; department; duty.

The department shall make report information received under section 54-2613 available to the public in a timely manner to permit the use of the information while it is still relevant.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 14.